Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.482

Civil infractions—Notice—Misdemeanors.

(1) The director shall have the authority to issue a notice of civil infraction if an infraction is committed in his or her presence or, if after investigation, the director has reasonable cause to believe an infraction has been committed.

(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to refuse to properly identify himself or herself for the purpose of issuance of a notice of infraction.

(3) Any person willfully failing to respond to a notice of infraction is guilty of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the notice of infraction.

[ 2006 c 270 s 10; 2004 c 43 s 3; 2003 c 53 s 161; 1986 c 178 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 43: See note following RCW 7.80.150.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.